Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3103
Legislative intent.

The Legislature encourages counties to work together under the provisions of the County Purchasing Act when joint purchases would be to the best advantage of such counties.

Laws 1985, LB 393, § 3.